California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) Such registration may be made by filing (1) an application for registration signed by a corporate officer stating the name of the corporation, the state or place under the laws of which it is incorporated, and that it desires to register its name under this section; and (2) a certificate of an authorized public official of the state or place in which it is organized
 issued within the past six months from the submission of the application for registration in California stating that such corporation is in good standing under those laws. Such registration shall be effective until the close of the calendar year in which the application for registration is filed.

(c) A corporation that has in effect a registration of its corporate name may renew such registration from year to year by annually filing an application for renewal setting forth the facts required to be set forth in an original application for registration and a certificate of good standing as required for the original registration between the first day of October and the 31st day of December in each year. Such renewal application shall extend the registration for the following calendar year.

(d) A corporation that has in effect a registration of its corporate name may cancel the registration by delivering to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a certificate of cancellation of foreign name registration signed by a corporate officer containing the name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 32.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

A foreign corporation which has filed a designation of an agent for the service of process, pursuant to the requirements of any law relating to the qualification of foreign corporations in force at the time of the filing, need not file the statement provided for in Section 2105, but shall file an amended statement and designation when required by Section 2107.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

Nothing in this chapter repeals, alters or amends the provisions of Sections 1600 to 1605, inclusive, of the Insurance Code or prevents any foreign insurance company from carrying out contracts made before the surrender of its right to engage in intrastate business or contracts made with citizens of other states who subsequently become citizens of or residents in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 33.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

Any foreign lending institution which has not qualified to do business in this state and which engages in any of the activities set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 191 shall be considered by such activities to have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for any action arising out of any such activities, and, on or before June 30th of each year, shall file a statement showing the address to which any notice or process may be sent in the manner and with the effect provided in Section 2111.

No foreign lending institution solely by reason of engaging in any one or more of the activities set forth in
 subdivision (d) of Section 191 shall be required to qualify to do business in this state nor be subject to (a) any of the provisions of the Bank and Corporation Tax Law (commencing with Section 23001) of the Revenue and Taxation Code or (b) any of the provisions of this code or the Financial Code or Insurance Code relating to qualifications for doing or transacting business in this state or to requirements pertaining thereto or to the effects or results of failure to qualify to do business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

(a) A foreign corporation shall not transact intrastate business without having first obtained from the Secretary of State a certificate of qualification. To obtain that certificate it shall file, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement and designation signed by a corporate officer or, in the case of a foreign association that has no officers, signed by a trustee stating:

(1) The name of the corporation, and, if the name does not comply with Section 201, an alternate name adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(2) The state or place of its incorporation or organization and a statement that the
 foreign corporation is authorized to exercise its powers and privileges in that state or place of its incorporation or organization.

(3) The street address of its principal office.

(4) The street address of its principal office in California, if any.

(5) The mailing address of its principal office, if different from the addresses specified pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4).

(6) The name of an agent upon whom process directed to the corporation may be served within this state. The designation shall comply with subdivision (b) of Section 1502.

(7) (A) Its irrevocable consent to service of
 process directed to it upon the agent designated and to service of process on the Secretary of State if the agent designated or the agent’s successor is no longer authorized to act or cannot be found at the address given.

(B) Consent under this paragraph extends to service of process directed to the foreign corporation’s agent in this state for a search warrant issued pursuant to Section 1524.2 of the Penal Code, or for any other validly issued and properly served search warrant, for records or documents that are in the possession of the foreign corporation and are located inside or outside of this state. This subparagraph shall apply to a foreign corporation that is a party or a nonparty to the matter for which the search warrant is sought. For purposes of this subparagraph, “properly served” means delivered by hand, or in a manner
 reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to a person or entity listed in Section 2110, or any other means specified by the foreign corporation, including, but not limited to, email or submission via an internet web portal that the foreign corporation has designated for the purpose of service of process.

(8) If it is a corporation that will be subject to the Insurance Code as an insurer, it shall state that fact.

(b) Annexed to the statement and designation shall be a certificate by an authorized public official of the state or place of incorporation of the corporation to the effect that the corporation is an existing corporation in good standing in that state or place or, in the case of an association,
 an officers’ certificate stating that it is a validly organized and existing business association under the laws of a specified foreign jurisdiction.

(c) Before it may be designated by a foreign corporation as its agent for service of process, a corporate agent must comply with Section 1505.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 34.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

(a) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), upon payment of the fees required by law the Secretary of State shall file the statement and designation prescribed in Section 2105 and shall issue to the corporation a certificate of qualification stating the date of filing of said statement and designation and that the corporation is qualified to transact intrastate business, subject, however, to any licensing requirements otherwise imposed by the laws of this state.

(b) No foreign corporation having a name which would not be available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 201 to a new corporation organized under this division shall transact
 intrastate business in this state or qualify to do so under this chapter or file an amended statement and designation containing such name unless either: (1) it obtains and files an order from a court of competent jurisdiction permanently enjoining the other corporation having a conflicting name from doing business in this state under that name; or (2) the Secretary of State finds, upon proof by affidavit or otherwise as the Secretary of State may determine, that the business to be conducted in this state by the foreign corporation is not the same as or similar to the business being conducted by the corporation (or to be conducted by the proposed corporation) with whose name it may conflict and that the public is not likely to be deceived, and the foreign corporation agrees that it will transact business in this state under an alternate name disclosed to the Secretary of State and that it will use
 the alternate name in all of its dealings with the Secretary of State and in the conduct of its affairs in this state. The alternate name may be its name with the addition of some distinguishing word or words acceptable to the Secretary of State or a name available for the name of a domestic corporation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 201. A corporation which has made such an agreement with the Secretary of State shall not do business in this state except under the name agreed upon, so long as the agreement remains in effect.

This subdivision shall not apply to any corporation that is subject to the Insurance Code as an insurer unless the insurer has first obtained from the Insurance Commissioner a certificate approving the alternate name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 35.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.5.

The Secretary of State shall not file any statement and designation pursuant to Section 2106 or any amended statement and designation pursuant to Section 2107, where it appears that the business is that of an insurer subject to the Insurance Code unless a certificate of the Insurance Commissioner approving the corporate name is attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

(a) If any foreign corporation (but not a foreign association) qualified to transact intrastate business shall change its name or make a change affecting an alternate name under Section 2106, it shall file, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, an amended statement signed by a corporate officer setting forth the change made. The amended statement shall set forth the name relinquished as well as the new name alternate and there shall be annexed to the amended statement a certificate of an authorized public official of its state or place of incorporation issued within the past six months from the submission of the amended statement for filing in California that the change of name was made in accordance with the laws of that state or place
 of incorporation. Upon the filing of the amended statement, the Secretary of State shall issue a new certificate of qualification.

(b) If any foreign association qualified to transact intrastate business shall change its name, the address of its principal office in California, the address of its principal office or its agent for the service of process, or if the stated address of any natural person designated as agent is changed, it shall file, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, an amended statement and designation signed by an officer or, in the case of a foreign association that has no officers, signed by a trustee setting forth the change or changes made. In the case of a change of name, the amended statement and designation shall set forth the name relinquished as well as the new name alternate and there shall be annexed to
 the amended statement and designation an officer’s certificate, or trustee’s certificate, if applicable, stating that such change of name was made in accordance with its declaration of trust. If the change includes a change of name, or a change affecting an alternate name pursuant to Section 2106, upon the filing of the amended statement, the Secretary of State shall issue a new certificate of qualification.

(c) If the change includes a change of name of an insurer subject to the Insurance Code, the form shall include a statement that the corporation is such an insurer if it does not already so appear.

(d) If a foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this state shall change the address of its principal office in California, the address of its principal office, or its agent
 for the service of process, or if the stated address of any natural person designated as agent is changed, the filing of a statement pursuant to Section 2117 shall supersede the statement and designation with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 36.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

Delivery by hand of a copy of any process against a foreign corporation (a) to any officer of the corporation or its general manager in this state, or if the corporation is a bank to a cashier or an assistant cashier, (b) to any natural person designated by it as agent for the service of process, or (c), if the corporation has designated a corporate agent, to any person named in the latest certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 1505 shall constitute valid service on the corporation. A copy of the statement and designation, or a copy of the latest statement filed pursuant to Section 2117, certified by the Secretary of State, is
 sufficient evidence of the appointment of an agent for the service of process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 438, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.1.

In addition to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, process may be served upon a foreign corporation as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

(a) If the agent designated for the service of process is a natural person and cannot be found with due diligence at the address stated in the designation or if the agent is a corporation and no person can be found with due diligence to whom the delivery authorized by Section 2110 may be made for the purpose of delivery to the corporate agent, or if the agent designated is no longer authorized to act, or if no agent has been designated and if no one of the officers or agents of the corporation specified in Section 2110 can be found after diligent search and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, then the court may
 make an order that service be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State or to an assistant or deputy secretary of state of two copies of the process together with two copies of the order, except that if the corporation to be served has not filed the statement required to be filed by Section 2105 then only one copy of the process and order need be delivered but the order shall include and set forth an address to which the process shall be sent by the Secretary of State. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(b) Upon receipt of the process and order and the fee therefor the Secretary of State forthwith shall give notice to the corporation of the service of the process by forwarding by registered or certified mail, with request for return receipt, a copy of the process and order to the address specified in the order if the corporation has not filed the statement
 required by Section 2105 or to the two stated addresses of the corporation set forth in the latest statement filed pursuant to Section 2105 or 2117, or if only one address is set forth in the latest statement, to the sole stated address of the corporation.

(c) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State and shall record therein the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with respect thereto. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the giving of notice thereof to the corporation, and the forwarding of the process pursuant to this section, shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 438, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

(a) Subject to Section 2113, a foreign corporation which has qualified to transact intrastate business may surrender its right to engage in that business within this state by filing a certificate of surrender signed by a corporate officer or, in the case of a foreign association that has no officers, signed by a trustee stating:

(1) The name of the corporation as shown on the records of the Secretary of State, and the state or place of incorporation or organization.

(2) That it revokes its designation of agent for service of process.

(3) That it surrenders its
 authority to transact intrastate business.

(4) That it consents that process against it in any action upon any liability or obligation incurred within this state before the filing of the certificate of surrender may be served upon the Secretary of State.

(5) A post office address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process against the corporation that is served upon the Secretary of State, which address or the name to which the process should be sent may be changed from time to time by filing a statement signed by a corporate officer or, in the case of a foreign association that has no officers, signed by a trustee stating the new address or name or both.

(6) Except in the case of a foreign association, that a
 final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board, as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the surrender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 37.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

(a) The filing of an agreement of merger of a foreign disappearing corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state pursuant to Section 1103, or the filing pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1108 of an agreement, certificate, or other document as to a merger that includes a disappearing foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business, or the filing of a certificate of
 ownership as to a foreign subsidiary corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state pursuant to Section 1110, or the filing by a foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state of an organizational document containing a statement of conversion pursuant to Section 15911.08, 16908, or 17710.08, constitutes the surrender by the foreign corporation of its right to engage in intrastate business within this state.

(b) With respect to corporations for which documents have not been filed as provided in subdivision (a), a certificate of surrender as prescribed by Section 2112 shall be filed by a foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business upon its merger into another foreign corporation.

(c) In lieu of a signature as prescribed by Section 2112, a certificate of surrender pursuant to subdivision (b) for a merged foreign
 corporation may be signed in the name of the surviving corporation by an officer thereof. In that case, the certificate of surrender shall be accompanied by a certificate of an authorized public official of the state or place of incorporation of the merged foreign corporation stating that the corporation has been merged into another foreign corporation and setting forth the name and state or place of incorporation of the surviving foreign corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 10.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

(a) A foreign corporation that has transacted intrastate business and has thereafter withdrawn from business in this state may be served with process in the manner provided in this chapter in any action brought in this state arising out of that business, whether or not it has ever complied with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) A foreign corporation that has surrendered its right to transact intrastate business pursuant to Section 2112 or 2113 may be served with process in any
 action upon a liability or obligation incurred within this state prior to that surrender by delivery of the process to the Secretary of State, or an assistant or a deputy to the Secretary of State pursuant to this chapter and no court order authorizing this service shall be required. The process shall be mailed in the manner prescribed in this chapter except that it shall be sent to the address to which process is authorized to be sent in the certificate of surrender or to the address of the surviving domestic corporation in the case of a surrender under Section 2113.

(c) If a foreign corporation that is qualified to transact intrastate business has its right to transact such business forfeited by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to the Bank and Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), service of process on that corporation may be effected in the manner set forth in Sections
 2110 and 2111, as if the right to transact intrastate business had not been forfeited.

(d) The fact that a corporation ceases to transact intrastate business without filing a certificate of surrender does not revoke the appointment of any agent for the service of process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 187, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

(a) A foreign corporation (other than a foreign association or foreign nonprofit corporation but including a foreign parent corporation even though it does not itself transact intrastate business) is subject to the requirements of subdivision (b) commencing on the date specified in subdivision (d) and continuing until the date specified in subdivision (e) if:

(1) The average of the property factor, the payroll factor, and the sales factor (as defined in Sections 25129, 25132, and 25134 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) with respect to it is more than 50 percent during its latest full income year and

(2) more than one-half of
 its outstanding voting securities are held of record by persons having addresses in this state appearing on the books of the corporation on the record date for the latest meeting of shareholders held during its latest full income year or, if no meeting was held during that year, on the last day of the latest full income year. The property factor, payroll factor, and sales factor shall be those used in computing the portion of its income allocable to this state in its franchise tax return or, with respect to corporations the allocation of whose income is governed by special formulas or that are not required to file separate or any tax returns, which would have been so used if they were governed by this three-factor formula. The determination of these factors with respect to any parent corporation shall be made on a consolidated basis, including in a unitary computation (after elimination of intercompany
 transactions) the property, payroll, and sales of the parent and all of its subsidiaries in which it owns directly or indirectly more than 50 percent of the outstanding shares entitled to vote for the election of directors, but deducting a percentage of the property, payroll, and sales of any subsidiary equal to the percentage minority ownership, if any, in the subsidiary. For the purpose of this subdivision, any securities held to the knowledge of the issuer in the names of broker-dealers, nominees for broker-dealers (including clearing corporations), or banks, associations, or other entities holding securities in a nominee name or otherwise on behalf of a beneficial owner (collectively “nominee holders”), shall not be considered outstanding. However, if the foreign corporation requests all nominee holders to certify, with respect to all beneficial owners for whom securities are held, the number of
 shares held for those beneficial owners having addresses (as shown on the records of the nominee holder) in this state and outside of this state, then all shares so certified shall be considered outstanding and held of record by persons having addresses either in this state or outside of this state as so certified, provided that the certification so provided shall be retained with the record of shareholders and made available for inspection and copying in the same manner as is provided in Section 1600 with respect to that record. A current list of beneficial owners of a foreign corporation’s securities provided to the corporation by one or more nominee holders or their agent pursuant to the requirements of Rule 14b-1(b)(3) or 14b-2(b)(3) as adopted on January 6, 1992, promulgated under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, shall constitute an acceptable certification with respect to beneficial owners
 for the purposes of this subdivision.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the following chapters and sections of this division shall apply to a foreign corporation as defined in subdivision (a) (to the exclusion of the law of the jurisdiction in which it is incorporated):

Chapter 1 (general provisions and definitions), to the extent applicable to the following provisions;

Section 301 (annual election of directors);

Section 303 (removal of directors without cause);

Section 304 (removal of directors by court proceedings);

Section 305, subdivision (c) (filling of director vacancies where less than a majority in office elected by
 shareholders);

Section 309 (directors’ standard of care);

Section 316 (excluding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (f)) (liability of directors for unlawful distributions);

Section 317 (indemnification of directors, officers, and others);

Sections 500 to 505, inclusive (limitations on corporate distributions in cash or property);

Section 506 (liability of shareholder who receives unlawful distribution);

Section 600, subdivisions (b) and (c) (requirement for annual shareholders’ meeting and remedy if same not timely held);

Section 708, subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) (shareholder’s right to
 cumulate votes at any election of directors);

Section 710 (supermajority vote requirement);

Section 1001, subdivision (d) (limitations on sale of assets);

Section 1101, subdivision (b) (limitations on mergers);

Section 1151 (first sentence only) (limitations on conversions);

Section 1152 (requirements of conversions);

Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) (reorganizations);

Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) (dissenters’ rights);

Sections 1500 and 1501 (records and reports);

Section 1508 (action by Attorney General);

Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1600) (rights of inspection).

(c) This section does not apply to any corporation (1) with outstanding securities listed on the New York Stock Exchange, the NYSE American, the NASDAQ Global Market, or the NASDAQ Capital Market, or (2) if all of its voting shares (other than directors’ qualifying shares) are owned directly or indirectly by a corporation or corporations not subject to this section.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the requirements of subdivision (b) shall become applicable to a foreign corporation only upon the first day of the first income year of the corporation (1) commencing on or after the 135th day of the income year immediately following the latest income year with respect to
 which the tests referred to in subdivision (a) have been met or (2) commencing on or after the entry of a final order by a court of competent jurisdiction declaring that those tests have been met.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (a), the requirements of subdivision (b) shall cease to be applicable to a foreign corporation (1) at the end of the first income year of the corporation immediately following the latest income year with respect to which at least one of the tests referred to in subdivision (a) is not met or (2) at the end of the income year of the corporation during which a final order has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction declaring that one of those tests is not met, provided that a contrary order has not been entered before the end of the income year.

(f) Any foreign corporation that is subject to the requirements of subdivision (b) shall advise any shareholder of record, any officer, director, employee, or other agent (within the meaning of Section 317) and any creditor of the corporation in writing, within 30 days of receipt of written request for that information, whether or not it is subject to subdivision (b) at the time the request is received. Any party who obtains a final determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that the corporation failed to provide to the party information required to be provided by this subdivision or provided the party information of the kind required to be provided by this subdivision that was incorrect, then the court, in its discretion, shall have the power to include in its judgment recovery by the party from the corporation of all court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in that legal
 proceeding to the extent they relate to obtaining that final determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 38.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.5.

(a) Section 301.3 shall apply to a foreign corporation that is a publicly held corporation to the exclusion of the law of the jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “publicly held corporation” means a foreign corporation with outstanding shares listed on a major United States stock exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 954, Sec. 3.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.6.

(a) Section 301.4 shall apply to a foreign corporation that is a publicly held corporation to the exclusion of the law of the jurisdiction in which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “publicly held corporation” means a foreign corporation with outstanding shares listed on a major United States stock exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 316, Sec. 4.   (AB 979)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2116.

The directors of a foreign corporation transacting intrastate business are liable to the corporation, its shareholders, creditors, receiver, liquidator or trustee in bankruptcy for the making of unauthorized dividends, purchase of shares or distribution of assets or false certificates, reports or public notices or other violation of official duty according to any applicable laws of the state or place of incorporation or organization, whether committed or done in this state or elsewhere. Such liability may be enforced in the courts of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.

(a) Every foreign corporation (other than a foreign association) qualified to transact intrastate business shall file, within 90 days after the filing of its original statement and designation of foreign corporation and annually thereafter during the applicable filing period, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement containing all of the following:

(1) The name of the corporation as registered in California and the California Secretary of State’s file number.

(2) The names and complete business or residence addresses of its chief executive officer, secretary, and chief financial officer.

(3) The
 street address of its principal executive office.

(4) The mailing address of the corporation, if different from the street address of its principal executive office.

(5) The street address of its principal business office in this state, if any.

(6) If the corporation chooses to receive renewal notices and any other notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, the corporation shall include a valid electronic mail address for the corporation or for the corporation’s designee to receive those notices.

(7) A statement of the general type of business that constitutes the principal business activity of the corporation, such as, for example, manufacturer of aircraft, wholesale liquor distributor, or retail
 department store.

(8) A statement indicating whether any officer or any director has an outstanding final judgment issued by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or a court of law, for which no appeal therefrom is pending, for the violation of any wage order or provision of the Labor Code.

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall also designate, as the agent of the corporation for the purpose of service of process, a natural person residing in this state or a corporation that has complied with Section 1505 and whose capacity to act as the agent has not terminated. If a natural person is designated, the statement shall set forth the person’s complete business or residence street address. If a corporate agent is designated, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) The statement required by
 subdivision (a) shall be available and open to the public for inspection. The Secretary of State shall provide access to all information contained in the statement by means of an online database.

(d) In addition to any other fees required, a foreign corporation shall pay a five-dollar ($5) disclosure fee upon filing the statement required by subdivision (a). One-half of the fee shall, notwithstanding Section 12176 of the Government Code, be deposited into the Business Programs Modernization Fund established in subdivision (k) of Section 1502, and one-half shall be deposited into the Victims of Corporate Fraud Compensation Fund established in Section 2280.

(e) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) is changed, the corporation may file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). In order to change its agent for
 service of process or the address of the agent, the corporation shall file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). Whenever any statement is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed statement and the statement in the filing pursuant to Section 2105.

(f) Subdivisions (c), (d), (f), and (g) of Section 1502 apply to statements filed pursuant to this section, except that “articles” shall mean the filing pursuant to Section 2105, and “corporation” shall mean a foreign corporation.

(g) (1) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022, or upon certification by the Secretary of State that California Business Connect is implemented, whichever date is earlier.

(2) If the Secretary of State certifies California Business
 Connect is implemented prior to January 1, 2022, the Secretary of State shall post notice of the certification on the homepage of its internet website and send notice of the certification to the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added  by Stats. 2020, Ch. 357, Sec. 4.   (AB 3075)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Conditionally operative on or before January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.1.

(a) In addition to the statement required pursuant to Section 2117, every publicly traded foreign corporation shall file annually, within 150 days after the end of its fiscal year, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement that includes all of the following information:

(1) The name of the independent auditor that prepared the most recent auditor’s report on the publicly traded foreign corporation’s annual financial statements.

(2) A description of other services, if any, performed for the publicly traded foreign corporation during its two most recent fiscal years and the period between the end of its most recent fiscal year and the date of the statement by the foregoing independent
 auditor, by its parent corporation, or by a subsidiary or corporate affiliate of the independent auditor or its parent corporation.

(3) The name of the independent auditor employed by the foreign corporation on the date of the statement, if different from the independent auditor listed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) The compensation for the most recent fiscal year of the publicly traded foreign corporation paid to each member of the board of directors and paid to each of the five most highly compensated executive officers of the foreign corporation who are not members of the board of directors, including the number of any shares issued, options for shares granted, and similar equity-based compensation granted to each of those persons. If the chief executive officer is not among the five most highly compensated executive officers of the corporation, the compensation paid to the
 chief executive officer shall also be included.

(5) A description of any loan, including the amount and terms of the loans, made to any member of the board of directors by the publicly traded foreign corporation during the foreign corporation’s two most recent fiscal years at an interest rate lower than the interest rate available from unaffiliated commercial lenders generally to a similarly situated borrower.

(6) A statement indicating whether an order for relief has been entered in a bankruptcy case with respect to the foreign corporation, its executive officers, or members of the board of directors of the foreign corporation during the 10 years preceding the date of the statement.

(7) A statement indicating whether any member of the board of directors or executive officer of the publicly traded foreign corporation
 was convicted of fraud during the 10 years preceding the date of the statement, which conviction has not been overturned or expunged.

(8) A description of any material pending legal proceedings, other than ordinary routine litigation incidental to the business, to which the corporation or any of its subsidiaries is a party or of which any of their property is the subject, as specified by Item 103 of Regulation S-K of the Securities and Exchange Commission (Section 229.103 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations). A description of any material legal proceeding during which the corporation was found legally liable by entry of a final judgment or final order that was not overturned on appeal during the five years preceding the date of the statement.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Publicly traded foreign corporation” means a foreign corporation, as defined in Section 171, that is an issuer as defined in Section 3 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78c), and has at least one class of securities listed or admitted for trading on a national securities exchange, on the OTC Bulletin Board, or on the electronic service operated by OTC Markets Group Inc.
